Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-111 Reinsurance. (a) Any
captive insurance company may provide reinsurance on risks ceded by any other
insurer only upon approval of the reinsurance agreement by the commissioner.

(b) Any captive insurance company may take
credit for reserves on risks ceded to a reinsurer; provided that no captive
insurance company shall cede risks without the approval of the commissioner.

(c) In the case of a risk retention captive
insurance company, a risk retention captive insurance company:

(1) Shall qualify for credit for reinsurance on risks
ceded to a reinsurer if the reinsurer is in compliance with article 4A; or

(2) May qualify for credit for reinsurance on risks
ceded to a reinsurer, if the reinsurer meets the reinsurance guidelines for
risk retention captive insurance companies as adopted by the commissioner
pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1988, c 187, §12; am L
2013, c 193, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next